Illinois, session 104th, HB5415.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 48-10 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/48-10)7    Sec. 48-10. Dangerous animals.8    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section, unless the 9context otherwise requires:10        "Dangerous animal" means a lion, tiger, leopard, 11    ocelot, jaguar, cheetah, margay, mountain lion, lynx, 12    bobcat, jaguarundi, bear, hyena, wolf or coyote. Dangerous 13    animal does not mean any herptiles included in the 14    Herptiles-Herps Act. 15        "Owner" means any person who (1) has a right of 16    property in a dangerous animal or primate, (2) keeps or 17    harbors a dangerous animal or primate, (3) has a dangerous 18    animal or primate in his or her care, or (4) acts as 19    custodian of a dangerous animal or primate. 20        "Person" means any individual, firm, association, 21    partnership, corporation, or other legal entity, any 22    public or private institution, the State, or any municipal 23    corporation or political subdivision of the State.   HB5415- 2 -LRB104 18271 RLC 31710 b1        "Primate" means a nonhuman member of the order 2    primate, including but not limited to chimpanzee, gorilla, 3    orangutan, bonobo, gibbon, monkey, lemur, loris, aye-aye, 4    and tarsier. 5    (b) Dangerous animal or primate offense. No person shall 6have a right of property in, keep, harbor, care for, act as 7custodian of or maintain in his or her possession any 8dangerous animal or primate except at a properly maintained 9zoological park, federally licensed exhibit, circus, college 10or university, scientific institution, research laboratory, 11veterinary hospital, hound running area, or animal refuge in 12an escape-proof enclosure.13    (c) Exemptions.14        (1) This Section does not prohibit a person who had 15    lawful possession of a primate before January 1, 2011, 16    from continuing to possess that primate if the person 17    registers the animal by providing written notification to 18    the local animal control administrator on or before April 19    1, 2011. The notification shall include: 20            (A) the person's name, address, and telephone 21        number; and 22            (B) the type of primate, the age, a photograph, a 23        description of any tattoo, microchip, or other 24        identifying information, and a list of current 25        inoculations. 26        (2) This Section does not prohibit a person who has a   HB5415- 3 -LRB104 18271 RLC 31710 b1    permanent disability with a severe mobility impairment 2    from possessing a single capuchin monkey to assist the 3    person in performing daily tasks if: 4            (A) the capuchin monkey was obtained from and 5        trained at a licensed nonprofit organization described 6        in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 7        1986, the nonprofit tax status of which was obtained 8        on the basis of a mission to improve the quality of 9        life of severely mobility-impaired individuals; and 10            (B) the person complies with the notification 11        requirements as described in paragraph (1) of this 12        subsection (c). 13    (d) A person who registers a primate shall notify the 14local animal control administrator within 30 days of a change 15of address. If the person moves to another locality within the 16State, the person shall register the primate with the new 17local animal control administrator within 30 days of moving by 18providing written notification as provided in paragraph (1) of 19subsection (c) and shall include proof of the prior 20registration. 21    (e) A person who registers a primate shall notify the 22local animal control administrator immediately if the primate 23dies, escapes, or bites, scratches, or injures a person. 24    (f) It is no defense to a violation of subsection (b) that 25the person violating subsection (b) has attempted to 26domesticate the dangerous animal. If there appears to be   HB5415- 4 -LRB104 18271 RLC 31710 b1imminent danger to the public, any dangerous animal found not 2in compliance with the provisions of this Section shall be 3subject to seizure and may immediately be placed in an 4approved facility. Upon the conviction of a person for a 5violation of subsection (b), the animal with regard to which 6the conviction was obtained shall be confiscated and placed in 7an approved facility, with the owner responsible for all costs 8connected with the seizure and confiscation of the animal. 9Approved facilities include, but are not limited to, a 10zoological park, federally licensed exhibit, humane society, 11veterinary hospital or animal refuge. 12    (g) Sentence.13         (1) Any person violating this Section is guilty of a 14    Class C misdemeanor and is subject to a minimum fine of 15    $300 if the violation does not result in severe injury or 16    death to any person or damage to another person's 17    property.18        (2) If the violation results in severe injury or death 19    to any person, then any person violating this Section is 20    guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and subject to a fine of 21    not less that $1,000 and not to exceed $10,000.22        (3) If the violation results in damage to another 23    person's property, then any person violating this Section 24    is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and subject to a fine 25    not less than $300 and not to exceed $1,000.26        (4) Any corporation or partnership, any officer,   HB5415- 5 -LRB104 18271 RLC 31710 b1    director, manager or managerial agent of the partnership 2    or corporation who violates this Section or causes the 3    partnership or corporation to violate this Section is 4    guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.5        (5) Each day of violation constitutes a separate 6    offense. 7(Source: P.A. 98-752, eff. 1-1-15; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)